District of Columbia statutes.
47-2810

Conventions of national associations of hairdressers or cosmetologists exempted.

The provisions of Chapter 20 [repealed] of Title 3 and of § 47-2809 shall not be applicable to activities conducted in connection with any bona fide regularly scheduled national annual convention of any national association of professional hairdressers or cosmetologists, from which the general public is excluded.

History

Aug. 4, 1955, 69 Stat. 485, ch. 544, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Cross References

Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2810.
1973 Ed., § 47-2310a.